Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.190

Confidentiality.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, all information or reports obtained by the director from an applicant, licensee, or authorized delegate and all information contained in, or related to, examination, investigation, operating, or condition reports prepared by, on behalf of, or for the use of the director, or financial statements, balance sheets, or authorized delegate information, are confidential and are not subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) The director may disclose information not otherwise subject to disclosure under subsection (1) of this section to representatives of state or federal agencies who agree in writing to maintain the confidentiality of the information; or if the director finds that the release is reasonably necessary for the protection of the public and in the interests of justice.

(3) This section does not prohibit the director from disclosing to the public a list of persons licensed or reported with the department as authorized delegates under this chapter or the aggregated financial data concerning those licensees.

[ 2017 c 30 s 15; 2005 c 274 s 237; 2003 c 287 s 21.]